it: Sistema di accordatura del quinto: Accordatura con chiave a brugola/esagonale; Accordatura a chiave (chiave di accordatura); Accordatura a tiranti; Sistema ad accordatura rapida; Accordatura a corda; Altro
nb: Quinto-stemmesystem: Stemmes med unbrakonøkkel; Nøkkelstemt (stemmenøkkel); Skruestemt; Hurtigstemmingssystem; Taustemt; Annet
sk-SK: Systém ladenia Quinto: Ladenie inbusovým/šesťhranným kľúčom; Ladenie kľúčom (ladiaci kľúč); Ladenie skrutkami; Rýchly systém ladenia; Ladenie povrazom; Iné
pl: System strojenia Quinto: Strojone kluczem imbusowym / sześciokątnym; Strojone kluczem (klucz do strojenia); Strojone śrubami (lugi); System szybkiego strojenia; Strojone sznurkiem; Inne
hr-HR: Sustav ugađanja Quinto: Ugađanje inbus/šesterokutnim ključem; Ugađanje ključem (ključ za ugađanje); Ugađanje vijcima; Sustav za brzo ugađanje; Ugađanje užetom; Ostalo
zh-TW: 康加鼓調音系統: 內六角扳手調音; 扳手調音 (調音扳手); 鼓耳調音; 快速調音系統; 繩索調音; 其他
vi: Hệ thống chỉnh âm của trống Quinto: Chỉnh bằng khóa Allen/lục giác; Chỉnh bằng khóa (cờ lê chỉnh âm); Chỉnh bằng vấu; Hệ thống chỉnh âm nhanh; Chỉnh bằng dây thừng; Khác
cs: Systém ladění Quinto: Ladění inbusovým klíčem; Ladění klíčem (ladicí klíč); Ladění pomocí šroubů; Systém rychlého ladění; Ladění provazem; Jiné
zh-CN: 主音鼓调音系统: 内六角扳手调音; 钥匙调音（调音扳手）; 螺耳调音; 快速调音系统; 绳索调音; 其他
en: Quinto tuning system: Allen/hex key tuned; Key tuned (tuning wrench); Lug tuned; Quick tune system; Rope tuned; Other
sv: Stämningssystem för quinto: Stäms med insexnyckel; Stäms med nyckel (stämnyckel); Stäms med stämskruvar; Snabbt stämsystem; Stäms med rep; Övrigt
ko: 퀸토 튜닝 시스템: 육각/헥스 키 튜닝; 키 튜닝(튜닝 렌치); 러그 튜닝; 퀵 튠 시스템; 로프 튜닝; 기타
th: ระบบปรับแต่งควินโต: ปรับเสียงด้วยประแจหกเหลี่ยม/ประแจแอล; ปรับเสียงด้วยกุญแจ (ประแจปรับจูน); ปรับเสียงด้วยสลักเกลียว; ระบบปรับเสียงด่วน; ปรับเสียงด้วยเชือก; อื่นๆ
hu: Quinto hangolási rendszer: Imbusz/hatszögletű kulccsal hangolt; Kulccsal hangolt (hangolókulcs); Babával hangolt; Gyorshangoló rendszer; Kötéllel hangolt; Egyéb
es: Sistema de afinación del quinto: Afinado con llave Allen/hexagonal; Afinado con llave (llave de afinación); Afinado con terminales; Sistema de afinación rápida; Afinado con cuerdas; Otro
fi: Quinto-kongarummun viritysjärjestelmä: Kuusiokoloavaimella viritettävä; Avaimella viritettävä (viritysavain); Kiristimillä viritettävä; Pika-viritysjärjestelmä; Naruviritettävä; Muu
pt-BR: Quinto, sistema de afinação: Afinação com chave Allen/hexagonal; Afinação com chave (chave de afinação); Afinação por canoas (Lugs); Sistema de afinação rápida; Afinação por corda; Outro
ru: Система настройки квинто: Настройка шестигранным ключом; Настройка гаечным ключом; Настройка лагами; Система быстрой настройки; Веревочная настройка; Другое
da: Stemmesystem for quinto: Stemt med unbrakonøgle; Nøglestemt (stemmenøgle); Stemt med lugs; Quick tune-system; Stemt med reb; Andet
lt-LT: „Quinto“ derinimo sistema: Derinama „Allen“ / šešiabriauniu raktu; Derinama raktu (derinimo raktu); Derinama varžtais; Greitojo derinimo sistema; Derinama virve; Kita
sl-SI: Sistem uglaševanja kuinto bobna: Uglasitev z inbus/šestrobnim ključem; Uglasitev s ključem (ključ za uglaševanje); Uglasitev z zatiči/vijaki; Sistem za hitro uglasitev; Uglasitev z vrvjo; Drugo
de: Quinto-Stimmsystem: Gestimmt mit Inbus-/Sechskantschlüssel; Gestimmt mit Stimmschlüssel; Gestimmt mit Spannböckchen; Schnellstimmsystem; Seilspannung; Sonstige
tr: Quinto akort sistemi: Alyan/altıgen anahtar akortlu; Anahtar akortlu (akort anahtarı); Saplama akortlu; Hızlı akort sistemi; İp akortlu; Diğer
nl: Quinto-stemsysteem: Gestemd met inbussleutel; Gestemd met spansleutel; Lug-gestemd; Snelstemsysteem; Touwgestemd; Overig
fr: Système d'accordage Quinto: Accordé par clé Allen/hexagonale; Accordé par clé (clé d’accordage); Accordé par tirants; Système d’accordage rapide; Accordé par cordage; Autre
bg-BG: Система за настройка на квинто: Настройка с шестостенен ключ; Настройка с ключ (гаечен ключ за настройка); Настройка с болтове; Система за бърза настройка; Настройка с въже; Друго
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação do quinto: Afinação por chave Allen/sextavada; Afinação por chave (chave de afinação); Afinação por afina-bordões; Sistema de afinação rápida; Afinação por corda; Outro
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος quinto: Κούρδισμα με κλειδί Allen/εξαγωνικό; Κούρδισμα με κλειδί (κλειδί κουρδίσματος); Κούρδισμα με βίδες (lugs); Σύστημα γρήγορου κουρδίσματος; Κούρδισμα με σκοινί; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sistem de acordare pentru quinto: Acordat cu cheie Allen/hexagonală; Acordat cu cheie (cheie de acordaj); Acordat cu șuruburi; Sistem cu acordaj rapid; Acordat cu sfoară; Altele
ja: クイントチューニングシステム: アレン/六角レンチチューニング; キーチューニング (チューニングレンチ); ラグチューニング; クイックチューニングシステム; ロープチューニング; その他